District of Columbia statutes.
26-739

Establishment of agency agreements between affiliated depository institutions.

A District state bank that is a subsidiary of a bank holding company may agree to receive deposits, renew time deposits, close loans, service loans, receive payments on loans and other obligations, and perform such other services as the Superintendent [Commissioner] may determine are appropriate, as an agent for a depository institution affiliate.

June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-142, § 10, 43 DCR 2159
This section is referenced in § 26-735 and § 26-738.
1981 Ed., § 26-859.